Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6122.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 142. (1) The state treasurer shall, not more than 30 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, prepare a report that includes all of the following: (a) Whether the federal government is delinquent in federal funds owed to this state where the federal government has failed to comply with a court decision upholding federal congressionally approved spending. (b) Whether there will be any funds due to be paid by this state to the federal government during the 1-year period immediately following the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, including, but not limited to, federal taxes owed by this state as an employer, offsets for federal debts, backup withholding of federal taxes, and federal grant repayments. (2) The state treasurer shall update the report described in subsection (1) every month. The state treasurer shall consult with the state budget director in preparing a report under this section. (3) After calculating the amounts under section 143, the state treasurer shall withhold payments to the federal government. The withheld payments must not exceed the amounts calculated under section 143. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03896'25) or House Bill No. 6123 (request no. H03896'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.